Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1638
Plans and specifications; responsibility of engineer.

All plans and specifications for construction, reconstruction, enlargement, alteration, breach, removal, or abandonment of dams and supervision of construction shall be the responsibility of an engineer assisted by qualified engineering geologists and other specialists as necessary.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 38.